fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-1irr-osi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generatôr-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generatôr-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lotôkup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ôsi - ok : # -m inanate noun, canoe AEW NI1
     ôsi+N+I+Sg: ôsi      
     ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nitôt, nitôsim]
     ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kitôt, kitôsim]
     ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nitôtinân, nitôsiminân]
     ôsi+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kitôtinaw, kitôsiminaw]
     ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kitôtiwâw, kitôsimiwâw]
     ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:    [otôt, otôsim]
     ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:    [otôtiwâw, otôsimiwâw]
     ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [otôtiyiw, otôsimiyiw]

     ôsi+N+I+Pl: ôsa
     ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: [nitôta, nitôsima]
     ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: [kitôta, kitôsima]
     ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: [nitôtinâna, nitôsiminâna]
     ôsi+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl: [kitôtinawa, kitôsiminawa]
     ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: [kitôtiwâwa, kitôsimiwâwa]
     ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: [otôta, otôsima]
     ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: [otôtiwâwa, otôsimiwâwa]
     ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [otôtiyiwa, otôsimiyiwa]

     ôsi+N+I+Loc: ôsihk
     ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc:    [nitôtihk,   nitôsimihk]
     ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc:    [kitôtihk,   kitôsimihk]
     ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc:    [nitôtinâhk, nitôsiminâhk]
     ôsi+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc:   [kitôtinâhk, kitôsiminâhk]
     ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc:    [kitôtiwâhk, kitôsimiwâhk]
     ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc:    [otôtihk,    otôsimihk]
     ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc:    [otôtiwâhk,  otôsimiwâhk]
     ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: [otôtiyihk,  otôsimiyihk]

     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg:          [ôsis,         ôsisis]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nicôsimis,       nicôsimisis]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kicôsimis,       kicôsimisis]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nicôsimisinân,   nicôsimisisinân]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kicôsimisinaw,   kicôsimisisinaw]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kicôsimisiwâw,   kicôsimisisiwâw]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:    [ocôsimis,        ocôsimisis]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:    [ocôsimisiwâw,    ocôsimisisiwâw]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [ocôsimisiyiw,    ocôsimisisiyiw]

     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl:          [ôsisa,       ôsisisa]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nicôsimisa,     nicôsimisisa]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kicôsimisa,     kicôsimisisa]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nicôsimisinâna, nicôsimisisinâna]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kicôsimisinawa, kicôsimisisinawa]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kicôsimisiwâwa, kicôsimisisiwâwa]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl:    [ocôsimisa,      ocôsimisisa]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl:    [ocôsimisiwâwa,  ocôsimisisiwâwa]
     ôsi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [ocôsimisiyiwa,  ocôsimisisiyiwa]
